New York, session 2025-2026, A1801.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of subdivision 2 of section 400.02 of 2 the penal law, as added by chapter 371 of the laws of 2022, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 There shall be a statewide license and record database specific for 5 ammunition sales which shall be created and maintained by the division 6 of state police the cost of which shall not be borne by any municipality 7 no later than thirty days upon designating the division of state police 8 as the point of contact to perform both firearm and ammunition back- 9 ground checks under federal and state law. Records assembled or 10 collected for purposes of inclusion in such database shall not be 11 subject to disclosure pursuant to article six of the public officers 12 law. All records containing granted license applications from all 13 licensing authorities shall be monthly checked by the division of crimi- 14 nal justice services in conjunction with the division of state police 15 against criminal conviction, criminal indictments, mental health, 16 extreme risk protection orders, orders of protection, and all other 17 records as are necessary to determine their continued accuracy as well 18 as whether an individual is no longer a valid license holder. The divi- 19 sion of criminal justice services shall also check pending applications 20 made pursuant to this article against such records to determine whether 21 a license may be granted. All state and local agencies shall cooperate 22 with the division of criminal justice services, as otherwise authorized EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03551-01-5 A. 1801 2 1 by law, in making their records available for such checks. No later than 2 thirty days after the superintendent of the state police certifies that 3 the statewide license and record database established pursuant to this 4 section and the statewide license and record database established for 5 ammunition sales are operational for the purposes of this section, a 6 dealer in firearms licensed pursuant to section 400.00 of this article, 7 a seller of ammunition as defined in subdivision twenty-four of section 8 265.00 of this chapter shall not transfer any ammunition to any other 9 person who is not a dealer in firearms as defined in subdivision nine of 10 such section 265.00 or a seller of ammunition as defined in subdivision 11 twenty-four of section 265.00 of this chapter, is not licensed to carry 12 or possess a pistol or revolver or to purchase or take possession of a 13 semi-automatic rifle pursuant to section 400.00 of this article, or is 14 not licensed to hunt wildlife pursuant to section 11-0701 of the envi- 15 ronmental conservation law, unless: 16 § 2. The opening paragraph of subdivision 3 of section 400.03 of the 17 penal law, as added by chapter 1 of the laws of 2013, is amended to read 18 as follows: 19 No later than thirty days after the superintendent of the state police 20 certifies that the statewide license and record database established 21 pursuant to section 400.02 of this article is operational for the 22 purposes of this section, a dealer in firearms licensed pursuant to 23 section 400.00 of this article, a seller of ammunition as defined in 24 subdivision twenty-four of section 265.00 of this chapter shall not 25 transfer any ammunition to any other person who is not a dealer in 26 firearms as defined in subdivision nine of such section 265.00 or a 27 seller of ammunition as defined in subdivision twenty-four of section 28 265.00 of this chapter, is not licensed to carry or possess a pistol or 29 revolver or to purchase or take possession of a semi-automatic rifle 30 pursuant to section 400.00 of this article, or is not licensed to hunt 31 wildlife pursuant to section 11-0701 of the environmental conservation 32 law, unless: 33 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 34 have become a law.